Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,107.03
Parole School; curriculum.

(1) The board shall conduct Parole School sessions in each facility on a regular and recurring basis to equip committed offenders with the knowledge, skills, and confidence needed to navigate the parole process successfully.

(2) Parole School curriculum shall include, but need not be limited to, the following areas:

(a) Understanding parole guidelines, including:

(i) Comprehensive instruction on the legal framework and regulations governing parole;

(ii) Explanation of eligibility criteria and conditions for parole release; and

(iii) Clarification on the role of the board in its decisionmaking process;

(b) Preparing for parole board hearings, including:

(i) Guidance on compiling a thorough parole packet, including personal statements, character references, and evidence of rehabilitation efforts;

(ii) Workshops on effective communication and presentation skills for the parole board hearing; and

(iii) Mock parole board hearings to simulate real-life scenarios and receive constructive feedback;

(c) Factors considered by the board, including:

(i) Factors considered under section 83-1,114;

(ii) Insight into the importance of demonstrating remorse, accountability, and rehabilitation efforts; and

(iii) Strategies for addressing past mistakes and highlighting personal growth and positive change; and

(d) Interacting with parole board and parole officers, including:

(i) Training on respectful and professional communication with board members and parole officers;

(ii) Role-playing exercises to practice answering difficult questions and addressing concerns raised by the board; and

(iii) Guidance on complying with parole conditions and navigating the reintegration process post-release.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 41.
July 19, 2024